Missouri, session 2026, HB1858.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 531.050, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 531.050, to read as follows:
531.050. In case any person, against whom any such information in the nature of a
quo warranto shall be prosecuted, shall be adjudged guilty of any usurpation of, or intrusion
into, or unlawfully holding and executing any office or franchise, it may be lawful for the
court as well to give judgment of ouster against such person from any of the said offices or
franchises, as to fine such person for his usurpation of, intruding into or unlawfully holding
and executing any such office or franchise, and to give judgment that the relator in such
information named shall recover his costs of such prosecution; and if judgment shall be given
for the defendant in such information, he shall recover his costs against such relator. Any
person against whom such judgment is entered shall be permanently barred from
holding, being appointed to, or appearing on any ballot for the office for which
judgment was entered against such person.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.